Utah statutes.
73-3b-105.   Administrative procedures.

The administrative procedures applicable to the issuance, modification, suspension, or revocation of a recharge permit or recovery permit are those set forth in Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, and Sections 73-3-6, 73-3-7, 73-3-14, and 73-3-15.

